Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
General Provisions

§ 45-1-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

[Codes, 1942, §§ 8078, 8084, 8121; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 404; Laws, 1952, ch. 356; Laws, 1958, ch. 320; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 33; ch. 569, § 1]

§ 45-1-2.
Executive Director of Department of Public Safety to be commissioner; organization of department; Commissioner of Public Safety; statewide safety training officer; Mississippi Analysis and Information Center (MSAIC Fusion Center) established within Office of Homeland Security.

The Executive Director of the Department of Public Safety shall be the Commissioner of Public Safety.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Public Safety, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law including, but not limited to:

Office of Public Safety Planning;

Office of Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol;

Office of Forensics Laboratories, which includes the Office of the Medical Examiner;

Office of Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy;

Office of Support Services;

Office of Narcotics, which shall be known as the Bureau of Narcotics; and

Office of Homeland Security.

The department shall be headed by a commissioner, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the commissioner shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate. The commissioner may assign to the appropriate offices such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the department’s lawful functions.

The commissioner of the department shall appoint heads of offices, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The commissioner shall have the authority to organize the offices established by subsection (2) of this section as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. The organization charts of the department shall be presented annually with the budget request of the Governor for review by the Legislature.

The commissioner of the department shall appoint, from within the Department of Public Safety, a statewide safety training officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and whose duty it shall be to perform public training for both law enforcement and private persons throughout the state concerning proper emergency response to the mentally ill, terroristic threats or acts, domestic conflict, other conflict resolution, and such other matters as the commissioner may direct.

The commissioner of the department shall establish within the Office of Homeland Security a Mississippi Analysis and Information Center (MSAIC Fusion Center) which shall be the highest priority for the allocation of available federal resources for statewide information sharing, including the deployment of personnel and connectivity with federal data systems. Subject to appropriation therefor, the Mississippi Fusion Center shall employ three (3) regional analysts dedicated to analyzing and resolving potential threats identified by the agency’s statewide social media intelligence platform and the dissemination of school safety information.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 58; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 26; Laws, 2000, ch. 492, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 595, § 20; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015, Laws, 2019, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 427, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 45-1-3.
Rule-making power of commissioner.

When not otherwise specifically provided, the commissioner is authorized to make and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to be coordinated, and carry out the general provisions of the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8090; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 45-1-5.
Employment of administrative, clerical and other employees.

The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized and empowered to employ such administrative, professional, technical, stenographic, clerical and other employees as may be necessary to perform the duties of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol to comply with the provisions of the Mississippi Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Law, being Chapter 15 of Title 63 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, and to perform the duties under all other laws required to be administered under the supervision of the commissioner. The commissioner shall fix the salaries of all such employees where such salaries are not otherwise fixed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8085; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 6; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 508, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 45-1-6.
Special contract agents authorized; powers; qualifications; form of contract; agents not considered employees of Mississippi Bureau of Investigation.

The Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation is authorized to retain on a contractual basis such persons as he shall deem necessary to detect and apprehend violators of the criminal statutes of this state.

Those persons contracting with the Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation pursuant to subsection (1) shall be known and hereinafter referred to as “special contract agents.”

The investigative services provided for in this section shall be designed to support local law enforcement efforts.

Special contract investigators shall have all powers necessary and incidental to the fulfillment of their contractual obligations, including the power of arrest when authorized by the Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation.

No person shall be a special contract investigator unless he is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

The Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation shall conduct a background investigation of all potential special contract investigators. All contract agents must meet the minimum standard requirements established by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training.

Any contract pursuant to subsection (1) shall be:

Reduced to writing; and

Terminable upon written notice by either party, and shall in any event terminate one (1) year from the date of signing; and

Approved as to form by the Attorney General.

Such contracts shall not be public records and shall not be available for inspection under the provisions of a law providing for the inspection of public records as now or hereafter amended.

Special contract investigators shall not be considered employees of the Bureau of Investigation for any purpose.

The Director of the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation shall have all powers necessary and incidental to the effective operation of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this section, all contracts authorized under this section and related matters shall be made available to the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 45-1-7.
Legislators ineligible to serve.

No member of the Legislature shall be eligible to serve as an officer or employee or in any other capacity under the provisions of the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8122; Laws, 1938, ch. 143.

§ 45-1-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2006, ch. 326, § 1, effective from and after passage (approved March 9, 2006).

[Codes, 1942, § 8084; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1966, ch. 569, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1966).]

§ 45-1-11.
Salaries may be paid on semi-monthly basis.

The commissioner of public safety is hereby authorized and empowered, in his discretion and with the approval of the state auditor of public accounts, to pay members of the highway safety patrol and other employees of the department of public safety on a semi-monthly basis.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8085.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1966).

§ 45-1-12.
Salaries of certain officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol and the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics.

The salaries of all officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol who have completed the course of instruction in an authorized highway patrol training school on general law enforcement, and are serving as a sworn officer of the Highway Patrol in the enforcement of the laws of the State of Mississippi, including service in the driver’s license division and the sworn officers of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, shall be determined and paid in accordance with the scale for officers salaries as provided in this subsection:

Department of Public Safety Sworn Officers Salary Schedule

2015-2016 Fiscal Year and Thereafter

Click to view

Department of Public Safety/MS Bureau of Narcotics

Sworn Officers Salary Schedule

2015-2016 Fiscal Year and Thereafter

Click to view

All sworn officers in the Mississippi Highway Patrol and the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics employed on a full-time basis shall be paid a salary in accordance with the above scale. The rank and years of experience of each sworn officer to be used in establishing the salary shall be determined by the rank and years of experience on July 1 of the current fiscal year.

For purposes of applying the rank designation to the above scale, the following job classifications of the State Personnel Board shall be applicable for the Mississippi Highway Patrol:

RankJob Classes

TrooperDPS-Highway Patrol Officer I

LE-Investigator II

Trooper First ClassDPS-Highway Patrol Officer II

LE-Investigator III

CorporalDPS-Highway Patrol Officer III

LE-Investigator IV

SergeantDPS-Highway Patrol Officer IV

LE-Investigator V

Staff SergeantDPS-Highway Patrol Officer V

Senior Staff SergeantDPS-Highway Patrol Officer VI

Tech Spec

Master Sgt/Sgt. F/CDPS-Assistant Inspector

DPS-Highway Patrol Officer VII

DPS-Investigator I

DPS-Supv. Driver Serv.

LieutenantDPS-Air Operations Officer

DPS-Dir. Corr. Intelligence

DPS-Dist. Executive Officer

DPS-Regional Supv. Driver. Serv.

DPS-Branch Director

LE-Dir/Training

LE-Dist. Investigator

CaptainDPS-Staff Officer (MHP)

MajorDPS-Bureau Director II

Lt. ColonelDPS-Deputy Administrator;

DPS-Chief of Staff

Colonel/Chief of PatrolDir-Office of MS Hwy Safety Patrol

For purposes of applying the rank designation to the above scale, the following job classifications of the State Personnel Board shall be applicable for the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics:

RankJob Classes

AgentsLE-Agent I

LE-Agent II

LE-Agent III

LE-Agent IV

LE-Agent V

LE-Agent VI

LieutenantBN-District Investigator (LT)

CaptainBN-District Commander

MajorBN-Bureau Director II

Office Director I

Lt. ColonelBN-Deputy Administrator

ColonelDirector, Bureau of Narcotics

In any fiscal year after July 1, 2015, in the event the Legislature provides across-the-board salary increases to state employees whose compensation is paid from the State General Fund and subject to specific appropriation therefor by the Legislature, the State Personnel Board shall revise the salary scale above to provide the same percentage or dollar amount increase as has been appropriated for other state employees.

It shall be the duty of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to file with the Legislative Budget Office and the State Fiscal Officer such data and information as may be required to enable the said Legislative Budget Office and State Fiscal Officer to budget and distribute the funds necessary to compensate the sworn officers of the Department of Public Safety according to the requirements of the salary scale. Such data and information so filed may be revised from time to time as necessitated to reflect the current number and experience of sworn officers employed by the department.

Rank Years of Experience Less than 4 Over 4 Over 8 Over 12 Trooper 38,000 Trooper FC 41,000 Corporal 44,000 Sergeant 47,000 Rank Years of Experience Over 16 Over 20 Over 24 Over 29 Staff Sgt 50,000 Sr. Staff Sgt. 53,000 Sgt. 1st Class 56,000 59,000 Rank Years of Experience Over 5 Over 10 Over 15 Over 20 Over 25 Over 29 Master Sgt. 53,000 56,000 59,000 62,000 65,000 68,000 Lieutenant 62,000 65,000 68,000 71,000 74,000 77,000 Captain 74,000 77,000 80,000 83,000 86,000 Major 86,000 89,000 92,000 95,000 Lt. Colonel 95,000 98,000 101,000 104,000 Colonel 112,000 112,000 112,000 112,000

Rank Years of Experience Less than 4 Over 4 Over 8 Over 12 LE-Agent I 38,000 LE-Agent II 41,000 LE-Agent III 44,000 LE-Agent IV 47,000 Rank Years of Experience Over 16 Over 20 Over 24 Over 29 LE-Agent V 50,000 LE-Agent VI 53,000 Rank Years of Experience Over 7 Over 12 Over 17 Over 22 Over 27 Over 32 Lieutenant 62,000 65,000 68,000 71,000 74,000 77,000 Captain 74,000 77,000 80,000 83,000 86,000 Major 86,000 89,000 92,000 95,000 Lt. Colonel 95,000 98,000 101,000 104,000 Colonel 112,000 112,000 112,000 112,000

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 486, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2016.

§ 45-1-13.
Use of employees in other divisions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 45-1-1, 45-1-5, 45-1-17, 45-3-7 through 45-3-9, 63-1-13, 63-1-15, and 63-1-45 through 63-1-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, designating or specifying the division or department in which any employee shall be employed and the duties which such employee shall perform, the commissioner shall have full power and authority, in his discretion, to place and use any employees in any other division or department and to require such employees to perform and discharge duties arising under the Highway Safety Patrol and Driver’s License Law of 1938.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8119.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 8.

§ 45-1-15.
Purchase of workers’ compensation insurance.

The Department of Public Safety shall purchase workmen’s compensation insurance with coverage for all patrolmen and other personnel employed by the commissioner, as authorized by law. All personnel shall be entitled to the benefits prescribed by Sections 71-3-1 through 71-3-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, cited as the “Workmen’s Compensation Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8085; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 6; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 2; eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-1-17.
Crime detection and medical examiner laboratory.

The commissioner shall have the authority to establish, staff, equip and operate a crime detection and medical examiner laboratory, and to cooperate with the University Medical Center and other hospitals and laboratories in its operation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8085; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1944, ch. 331, § 1; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 6; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 4; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 377, § 2; eff July 1, 1956.

§ 45-1-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms from and after July 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 8084; Laws, 1938, ch. 143; Laws, 1940, ch. 167; Laws, 1966, ch. 569, § 1; repealed, Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 39; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 39; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 31; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 32; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 29; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 28; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 29; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 28; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 30]

§ 45-1-21.
Department of Public Safety authorized to charge fees for services and reports.

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety being required by law to keep various records and perform various services and being authorized to furnish certain records and services, the department, by direction of the Commissioner of Public Safety, shall establish and collect for such services a proper fee, commensurate with the service rendered and the cost of the service for the furnishing of any record or abstract thereof in the Department of Public Safety now or which may hereafter be required by law to be kept by said department, any photograph or photo copy or any report of any kind authorized by law, including services for polygraph tests and reports thereof.

No records shall be furnished by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety which are classified as confidential by law. All fees collected under this section shall be paid into the General Fund of the State Treasury in accordance with the provisions of Section 45-1-23(2).

(i) The Commissioner of Public Safety, by rule duly filed with the Secretary of State under the Administrative Procedures Act, may establish a card stock fee to be paid by an applicant when specifically authorized by statute for producing a license, permit or identification card bearing the likeness of the applicant. The card stock fee shall be the actual cost of producing the license, permit or identification card as set by contract rounded off to the next highest dollar.

The administrative rule filing shall include either:

1. A copy of the contract governing the actual cost of producing the license permit or identification card, from which nonpublic information may be redacted; or

2. An abstract of the pertinent parts of the contract verified to be correct by the person responsible for the administrative rule filing.

Monies collected for the card stock fee shall be deposited into a special card stock fee account which the Department of Public Safety shall use to pay the actual cost of producing the licenses and identification cards. Any monies collected in excess of the actual costs of the card stock fee may be used by the department to defray the cost of future photography, fraud deterrence and driver’s license technology initiatives. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8120-7; Laws, 1962, ch. 513; Laws, 1976, ch. 396, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 356 § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-1-23.
Payment of expenses of operating and administering department; budget; disposition of funds received.

The expenses of operating and administering the department of public safety, including the highway safety patrol, the bureau of investigation, and the safety responsibility bureau, shall be paid from monies appropriated for such purposes by the Mississippi Legislature.

The department of public safety shall comply with all the applicable provisions of Chapter 103, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, being the state budget and accounting act.

All funds received by the department of public safety and any bureau, department or division thereof shall be paid into the state treasury on the same day in which said funds are collected. The state auditor of public accounts may require the commissioner to adopt standard accounting procedures acceptable to the auditor for the handling of such sums.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8120.5, 8120.7; Laws, 1956, ch. 378, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 500; Laws, 1962, ch. 513; ch. 518, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 525, § 1; ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 396, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 478, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 45-1-25.
Director of Mississippi Forensics Laboratory; qualifications; removal.

The Director of the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory which has been established by the Commissioner of Public Safety under the authority of Section 45-1-17 shall be a person who is experienced in forensics laboratory operations, knowledgeable of the criminal justice system, and who shall have the following minimum qualifications:

Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major course work in forensic science, chemistry, biology, commercial science or physics.

At least five (5) years’ full-time employment in a forensics laboratory, with supervisory or administrative responsibility.

Thorough knowledge of the utilization of forensics laboratory services and their relation to the investigating law enforcement officers.

Thorough knowledge of techniques employed in processing of physical evidence.

Membership in professional organizations promoting advancement of forensic science.

Proven effectiveness as a manager and administrator.

Unusual strength in one or more of the above qualifications may compensate for failure to exactly satisfy paragraph (b) of this section.

The Director of the Forensics Laboratory may only be removed by the Commissioner of Public Safety upon proof of his inability to serve due to illness, administrative or managerial ineffectiveness, incompetence, malfeasance, dereliction of duty or moral turpitude.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 384; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 45-1-27.
Director of Crime Laboratory; responsibilities and duties.

The director shall have responsibilities and duties including but not limited to the following:

To plan and give general direction to activities or programs for which he is responsible, through the issuance of directives and orders.

To review proposed changes in policies affecting the operation of the division under his direction.

To maintain liaison with other agencies, divisions or departments of state and federal government.

To approve and maintain uniform procedures and standards of operation for the laboratory.

To supervise and approve procedures and processing of physical evidence.

To present testimony in court in analysis of physical evidence.

To supervise the state medical examiner.

To attend scientific conferences and hold classes for law enforcement officers.

To present budget requests to the legislative budget office and to legislative committees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 455, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 213, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 45-1-29.
Mississippi Forensics Laboratory; funding; fees for services.

The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall be funded separately from the Department of Public Safety. Any appropriated funds shall be maintained in an account separate from any funds of the Department of Public Safety and shall never be commingled with any funds of the department. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the utilization of the combined resources of the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory, the Division of Support Services of the Department of Public Safety or the Mississippi Justice Information Center to efficiently carry out the mission of the Department of Public Safety.

Grants and donations to the Forensics Laboratory may be accepted from individuals, the federal government, firms, corporations, foundations and other interested organizations and societies.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall establish and the Division of Support Services of the Department of Public Safety shall collect for services rendered proper fees commensurate with the services rendered by the Forensics Laboratory. Those fees shall be deposited into a special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Forensics Laboratory and expended in accordance with applicable rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration. Those fees may be used for any authorized expenditure of the Forensics Laboratory except expenditures for salaries, wages and fringe benefits.

Upon every individual convicted of a felony or misdemeanor, every individual who is nonadjudicated on a felony or misdemeanor case under Section 99-15-26 or 63-11-30(14), and every individual who participates in a pretrial intervention program established under Section 99-15-101 et seq., in a case where the Forensics Laboratory provided forensic science or laboratory services in connection with the case, the court shall impose and collect a separate laboratory analysis fee of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), in addition to any other assessments and costs imposed by statutory authority, unless the court finds that undue hardship would result by imposing the fee. All fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the special fund of the Forensics Laboratory created in subsection (3) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 455, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 401; Laws, 2002, ch. 621, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 495, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2018, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018, eff from and after July 1, 2018; brought forward without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 312 § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 45-1-31.
Mississippi Forensics Laboratory; vehicles and equipment.

The Forensics Laboratory shall be empowered to purchase, equip and maintain vehicles, as authorized by law, and other conveyances for necessary business such as travel to court, crime scene assistance and consultation. The vehicles shall be independent of the vehicles purchased and operated by the department of public safety.

Obsolete nonrepairable or salvageable equipment shall be sold, as provided by law, and the funds so derived shall go into the account of the Forensics Laboratory and be used to replace such equipment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 455, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 45-1-33.
Transfer of Office of Criminal Justice Planning and Juvenile Justice Advisory Committee.

The Office of Criminal Justice Planning, including the Juvenile Justice Advisory Committee, as constituted in the Governor’s Office of Federal-State Programs on June 30, 1989, is hereby transferred to the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 45-1-35.
Department of Public Safety to provide state highway accident statistics to Department of Transportation.

The Department of Public Safety shall provide each month to the Mississippi Department of Transportation accident statistics for accidents involving motor vehicles which occur on the designated state highway system. Information provided to the transportation department shall include at least the following:

The date of the accident and time of day (if known);

The location of the accident;

The cause of the accident (if known);

The number of vehicles involved; and

Injuries and fatalities resulting from the accident.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 380, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 45-1-37.
Commissioner authorized to enter into reciprocal agreements with bordering states for purpose of entering such state to make arrest; commissioner to require Department of Public Safety to enter into Memorandum of Understanding with county registrars for purpose of providing Mississippi Voter Identification Card.

The Commissioner of Public Safety is hereby authorized and directed to seek reciprocal agreements with bordering states to allow law enforcement officers of the State of Mississippi to enter into such bordering states while in pursuit of persons who have committed crimes for the purpose of apprehending and arresting such persons. Any state who enters into such reciprocal agreement shall be authorized to enter into the State of Mississippi for the same purpose.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall require the Department of Public Safety to enter into a Memorandum of Understanding, which is negotiated by the Secretary of State, with the registrar of each county for the purpose of providing a Mississippi Voter Identification Card.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 339, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 9, eff August 5, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 45-1-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms effective June 30, 2007.

§45-1-39. [Laws, 2000, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2005.)]

§ 45-1-41.
Disposition of seized property after notice to any known owner or lienholder.

Any property received, recovered or seized by the Department of Public Safety which is not forfeited or disposed of by court order may be released to the owner of or lienholder on the property upon receipt of payment for all storage and towing charges incurred by the Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Public Safety shall notify in writing, by United States certified mail, the owner or lienholder of the property at the owner’s or lienholder’s last known address that the owner or lienholder may retrieve the property. In the event that the owner or lienholder does not claim the property within thirty (30) days from the date of the receipt of the notice, the property is declared forfeited to the Department of Public Safety.

In the event the notice by mail is returned undelivered, the department shall cause to be made further search and inquiry to ascertain the reputed owner’s or lienholder’s street and post office address. If a new or additional address is ascertained, the department shall again issue notice. If a new or additional address is not ascertained, or if notice is again returned undelivered, the department shall cause an affidavit to be prepared to that effect which shall specify the acts of search and inquiry made in the effort to ascertain the owner’s or lienholder’s address. The affidavit shall be retained by the department for three (3) years. Upon the making of the affidavit, the property is declared forfeited to the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 45-1-43.
Emergency response and vehicular pursuit policies; state, county and local mandate; training procedures; sanctions for failure to adopt.

On or after January 1, 2005, each state, county and local law enforcement agency that conducts emergency response and vehicular pursuits shall adopt written policies and training procedures that set forth the manner in which these operations shall be conducted. Each law enforcement agency may create their own such policies or adopt an existing model. All pursuit policies created or adopted by any law enforcement agency must address situations in which police pursuits cross over into other jurisdictions. Law enforcement agencies which do not comply with the requirements of this provision are subject to the withholding of any state funding or state administered federal funding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 487, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 45-1-45.
Implementation of Internet-based data and information sharing network for exchange and viewing of certain felony and misdemeanor information; Information Exchange Network Fund created.

The Department of Public Safety shall implement an Internet-based data and information sharing network that will allow state and local law enforcement, court personnel, prosecutors and other agencies to exchange and view felony and misdemeanor information on current and former criminal offenders through a currently available, near real-time, updated hourly, nationwide jail database which represents fifty percent (50%) or more of all incarcerated persons in the country.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Information Exchange Network Fund.The purpose of the fund shall be to provide funding for the Web-based information sharing network required by subsection (1) of this section.Monies from the funds derived from assessments under Section 99-19-73 shall be distributed by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Public Safety.The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal-year limitations, and shall consist of:

Monies appropriated by the Legislature;

The interest accruing to the fund;

Monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73;

Monies received from the federal government;

Donations; and

Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 535, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 45-1-47.
Department of Public Safety authorized to sell and replace as needed its fleet of aircraft; use of proceeds.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary that may be found in Section 61-13-1 et seq., the Department of Public Safety is hereby authorized to sell any or all of its fleet of aircraft and replace the same with aircraft more suited to the needs of the department. The proceeds from the sale of such aircraft shall be retained by the Department of Public Safety to be used by the department to offset the cost of replacement aircraft purchased by the department and shall not be transferred to the State General Fund. However, in the event there are any proceeds remaining after the purchase of the replacement aircraft, the department shall transfer the remaining amounts to the State General Fund. The department is authorized to escalate its budget to expend the proceeds from the sale of the aircraft in a manner consistent with authorization granted in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 547, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 45-1-49
Mississippi Highway Patrol Troop K command center in Biloxi, Mississippi, renamed “Commissioner George Landon Phillips District Office.”

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety’s Highway Patrol District Office, located in Biloxi, Harrison County, Mississippi, which serves as the command center for Troop K of the Mississippi Highway Patrol, shall be named the “Commissioner George Landon Phillips District Office.”

The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare or have prepared a distinctive plaque, to be placed in a prominent place within the building, that states the background, accomplishments and service to the state of George Landon Phillips. The Department of Finance and Administration in conjunction with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety’s Highway Patrol Division shall erect or cause to be erected proper lettering or signage on the outdoor facade of the building displaying the official name of the building as the “Commissioner George Landon Phillips District Office.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.